Maryland, session 2025, SB0327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
7–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Affordable” means that housing costs do not exceed 30% of a household’s
income.
(c) “Affordable dwelling unit” means a dwelling unit that is affordable to
households earning 60% or less of the area median income.
(d) “Area median income” means the median household income for the area
adjusted for household size as published and annually updated by the U.S. Department of
Housing and Urban Development.
Article – Tax – Property
– 1 –

Ch. 106 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
7–522.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “AFFORDABLE DWELLING UNIT” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 7–501 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE.
(B) REAL PROPERTY THAT IS USED FOR RENTAL HOUSING MAY BE EXEMPT
FROM COUNTY PROPERTY TAX IF:
(1) THE OWNER OF THE REAL PROPERTY AND THE GOVERNING BODY
OF THE COUNTY AGREE THAT THE OWNER SHALL PAY A NEGOTIATED AMOUNT IN
LIEU OF THE COUNTY PROPERTY TAX; AND
(2) THE OWNER OF THE REAL PROPERTY ENTERS INTO AN
AGREEMENT WITH THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COUNTY TO MAINTAIN AT LEAST
50% 25% OF THE RENTAL HOUSING UNITS LOCATED AT THE REAL PROPERTY AS
AFFORDABLE DWELLING UNITS FOR A PERIOD OF AT LEAST 15 YEARS.
(C) IN AN AGREEMENT UNDER THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF
THE COUNTY MAY REQUIRE THE OWNER OF REAL PROPERTY TO MAINTAIN A HIGHER
PERCENTAGE OF RENTAL HOUSING UNITS AS AFFORDABLE DWELLING UNITS THAN
THE MINIMUM PERCENTAGE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (D) REAL PROPERTY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION IS EXEMPT WHEN THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION ARE MET.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 2 –